Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB849.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6.1. Prohibition on fluoride in public water systems.(a) Prohibition.--A supplier of water in this Commonwealth may not add fluoride or any fluoride-containing substance to a public water system.(b) Cessation.--Any supplier of water adding fluoride to a public water system on the effective date of this subsection shall cease adding fluoride to the public water system within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection.(c) Ordinances.--A county, municipal authority or any other political subdivision may not adopt or enforce an ordinance, 1234567891011121314151617181920 regulation or policy that requires or permits the adding of fluoride to a public water system.(d) Report.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, each supplier of water adding fluoride to a public water system as of the effective date of this subsection shall submit a report to the department detailing:(1) The name and license number of the responsible supplier of water.(2) The date fluoridation ceased.(3) The procedures and equipment used to discontinue fluoridation.(4) Measures taken to ensure ongoing compliance.(e) Notice.--The department shall post the reports under subsection (d) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(f) Penalties.--A violation of this section shall be deemed a violation under section 13. Each day of noncompliance shall constitute a separate violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0849PN0972 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819